Utah statutes.
23-21a-6.   Nonlapsing appropriation for appraisal and purchase.

There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of Wildlife Resources the sum of $11,000 for appraisal and purchase of the lands designated in Section 23-21a-3. This appropriation shall be non-lapsing.

